Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Chapter 21. Illicit Synthetic Drugs.

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 86, SLA 2014, which enacted this chapter, took effect October 14, 2014.

Sec. 17.21.010.
Illicit synthetic drugs.

A person may not possess, offer, display, market, advertise for sale, or sell an illicit synthetic drug.

A synthetic drug is illicit if

the label

is false or misleading;

does not specify the identity of the substances contained in the synthetic drug; or

does not specify the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and

the synthetic drug has one or more of the following characteristics:

the packaging or labeling of the synthetic drug suggests that the user will achieve euphoria, a hallucination, mood enhancement, relaxation, stimulation, or another effect on the body;

the name or packaging of the synthetic drug uses images or labels suggesting that it is a controlled substance or has the effect of a controlled substance;

the synthetic drug resembles a controlled substance in appearance, in chemical structure, or composition;

the synthetic drug is marketed or advertised for a particular use or purpose and the cost of the synthetic drug is disproportionately higher than other products marketed or advertised for the same or similar use or purpose;

the synthetic drug contains a warning label stating or suggesting that the synthetic drug is in compliance with state laws regulating controlled substances;

the synthetic drug is a product to which has been added a synthetic chemical or synthetic chemical compound that does not have a legitimate relationship to the advertised use of the product.

It is an affirmative defense to an action for a violation of this section that a product is expressly exempted from or is expressly regulated under and is in compliance with state or federal law. In this subsection, “affirmative defense” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 2014)

Sec. 17.21.020.
Exemption.

AS

17.21.010

does not apply to a synthetic drug intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to investigate the safety of drugs if the drug is plainly labeled “for investigational use only,” and the investigational use is authorized by state or federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 2014)

Sec. 17.21.030.
Enforcement and penalties.

The commissioner of public safety is responsible for enforcing this chapter and may

delegate that authority as appropriate; and

cooperate with the Department of Health and Social Services in carrying out the commissioner’s enforcement activities.

This section does not limit the authority of a peace officer.

A person who violates AS

17.21.010

is guilty of a violation, and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $500.

The provisions of this section are in addition to the remedies available under AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 2014)

Sec. 17.21.090.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise,

“controlled substance” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

;

“drug” has the meaning given in AS

17.20.370

;

“synthetic drug” means a substance that is

a chemical or chemical compound intended, when introduced into the human body, to mimic or simulate the effect of a drug or controlled substance;

in the form of

a crystalline or powder product in crystalline, loose powder, block, tablet, or capsule form; or

plant material in granular, loose leaf, powder, or liquid form or used as a food additive; and

not a controlled substance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 2014)